Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-724
Lines in cities or villages; exempt.

The provisions of sections 75-709 to 75-724 shall not apply to any line within the limits of any incorporated city or village.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 24, p. 1429;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 134.